test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h38_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: kilo
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: kilo
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: [kilo, kiloi]
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: kilos
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: kilo
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: kilo
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: kiloum
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: kiloa
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: kiloið
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: kiloið
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: kilonum
    kilo+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: kilosins
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: kiloini
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: kiloini
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: kilounum
    kilo+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: kiloanna
